Utah statutes.
58-28-304.   Temporary license -- License reciprocity.
(1)  The division may issue a temporary license to practice veterinary
medicine, surgery, and dentistry to any person not qualified for licensure
under Subsection (4) who meets all requirements of Section 58-28-302 with the
exception of Subsections 58-28-302(1)(b) and (d), except that the temporary
license shall by its terms expire at the date examination results are
available for the examination next following the date of the issuance of the
temporary license.
(2)  The temporary license shall permit the holder to practice under the
indirect supervision of a veterinarian licensed to practice in this state.
(3)  The division may extend the expiration date of the temporary license
until the following examination date if:
(a)  the applicant shows to the board good cause for failing to take or pass
the examination; and
(b)  the majority of the board members recommend the extension.
(4)  Upon the recommendation of the board, the division may issue a license
without examination to a person who:
(a)  has been licensed or registered to practice veterinary medicine, surgery,
and dentistry in any state, district, or territory of the United States or in
any foreign country, whose educational, examination, and experience
requirements are or were at the time the license was issued equal to those of
this state;
(b)  has engaged in the practice of veterinary medicine, dentistry, and
surgery while licensed by another jurisdiction for at least two years;
(c)  obtained the license in another jurisdiction after passing an examination
component acceptable to the division and the board;
(d)  produces satisfactory evidence of having practiced veterinary medicine
competently and in accordance with the standards and ethics of the profession
while practicing in another jurisdiction; and
(e)  produces satisfactory evidence of identity and good moral character as it
relates to the applicant's functions and practice as a licensed veterinarian.
